District of Columbia statutes.
29-1208.02

Articles of dissolution.

(a)

If dissolution of a statutory trust is authorized under § 29-1208.01, the trust shall deliver to the Mayor for filing articles of dissolution setting forth the:

(1)

Name of the trust; and

(2)

Date of the dissolution.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in § 29-102.03, a statutory trust is dissolved when articles of dissolution that comply with subsection (a) of this section, are filed by the Mayor.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1208.01.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 802 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.